Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4110
Unlawfully obtaining or possessing DNA samples or records; penalty.

(1) Any person who has possession of or access to individually identifiable DNA samples or DNA records in the State DNA Database or in the State DNA Sample Bank shall not disclose such samples or records in any manner to any person or agency not authorized to receive them knowing that such person or agency is not authorized to receive them.

(2) No person shall obtain individually identifiable DNA samples or DNA records from the State DNA Database or the State DNA Sample Bank without authorization to do so. Any person who knowingly violates this subsection is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1997, LB 278, § 10.